Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Collection of Debts Owed the Commonwealth

45.237.
Definitions for KRS 45.237 to 45.239 — Establishment of internal controls and preaudit procedures for state agencies — Collection of improper payments — Referral of certified debts by agency or local government to Department of Revenue — Information to be provided to State Treasurer.

As used in KRS

45.237

to

45.239

:

“Agency” means an organizational unit or administrative body in the executive branch of state government as defined in KRS

12.010

;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Court of Justice” means the Administrative Office of the Courts, all courts, and all clerks of the courts;

“Debt” means:

For agencies, a sum certain which has been certified as due and owing;

For local governments, a sum certain which has been certified as due and owing, including but not limited to any delinquent taxes or fees other than delinquent real and personal property taxes; and

For the Court of Justice, a legal debt, including any fine, fee, court costs, or restitution due the Commonwealth, which have been imposed by a final sentence of a trial court of the Commonwealth and for which the time permitted for payment pursuant to KRS

534.020

has expired;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Improper payment” means a payment made to a vendor, provider, or recipient due to error, fraud, or abuse; and

“Local government” means any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local government of the Commonwealth.

The cabinet shall develop for the executive branch of state government a system of internal controls and preaudit policies and procedures applicable to disbursement transactions for the purpose of prevention and detection of errors or fraud and abuse prior to the issuance of a check or warrant. The initial policies and procedures shall focus first on programs or activities that expend the most federal and general fund dollars. The cabinet shall develop preaudit procedures that meet the unique needs of each agency.

In establishing these systems of internal control and preaudit policies and procedures, the cabinet shall:

Consult with each agency within the executive branch to ascertain its unique fraud risks;

Establish policies and procedures for agency-level oversight of fraud risks, including risk assessment, risk tolerance, and management policies, and fraud-prevention processing controls;

Establish systems and procedures for detecting both unintentional errors and fraudulent misrepresentations that may have occurred in vendor invoices submitted for payment, applications submitted for benefits, claims for refunds of amounts previously paid or withheld, and other disbursements;

Establish systems and procedures for preventing and detecting unintentional errors and the fraudulent disbursement of funds by state government employees in the processing, approving, and paying of invoices, refunds, vouchers, benefit payments, and other disbursements; and

Consult with the state Auditor of Public Accounts, the Commonwealth Office of Technology, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, the Association of Certified Fraud Examiners, law enforcement agencies, or any other entity with knowledge and expertise in the detection and prevention of fraud.

Each agency shall diligently attempt to collect amounts paid to a vendor, provider, or recipient due to error, fraud, or abuse for sixty (60) days after the improper payment is discovered. If the improper payment has not been recovered after sixty (60) days, the agency shall certify the improper payment as a debt of the agency and shall refer all certified debts to the department.

A local government may, after making reasonable efforts to collect its debts, by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law, certify its debts that have been due and owing for more than ninety (90) days to the department for collection. The department may, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, prescribe the form and format of, and the information required in, referrals by a local government, which may be required to be made electronically.

Any funds recovered by an agency within the sixty (60) day collection period allowed under subsection (4) of this section and prior to referral to the department shall be allocated to the fund from which the improper payment was expended.

Each agency shall submit annual summaries of debts due to error, fraud, or abuse, improper payments discovered, and certified debts referred to the department to the Legislative Research Commission. These summaries shall include but not be limited to:

Debts owed the Commonwealth that have been identified by the agency, in accordance with the preaudit procedures established under this section, as those resulting from error, fraud, or abuse, of either the payee or the state agency;

The aggregate amount of money collected by the agency on those debts during the sixty (60) day period allowed under subsection (4) of this section; and

The aggregate amount of certified debts that the agency referred to the department.

Each agency shall provide information about each debt due to error, fraud, or abuse that is certified under this section to the State Treasurer for the Treasurer’s action under KRS 44.030(1).

Each local government shall, where feasible, provide information about each debt that is certified pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for the Treasurer’s action under KRS 44.030(1).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 192, § 1, effective April 21, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 61, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 88, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 158, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

45.238.
Powers and duties of Department of Revenue to collect referred debts — Cost-ineffective debts — Treatment of collected debts — Annual report.

Debts that are certified by an agency or by a local government as provided in KRS

45.237

shall be referred to the department for collection. The department shall be vested with all the powers necessary to collect any referred debts.

For those debts deemed unfeasible or cost ineffective to pursue, the department shall maintain written records of the debt and the reason the debt was deemed unfeasible or cost ineffective to pursue.

In the case of agencies, these debts shall be written off in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under the authority of subsection (6) of this section.

In the case of local governments, these debts shall be returned to the referring local government for further action.

All certified debts of agencies received by the department after the sixty (60) day collection period allowed in KRS 45.237(4), and all certified debts of a local government received by the department after the ninety (90) day collection period allowed by KRS 45.237(5), shall be subject to:

Interest at the tax interest rate determined under KRS

131.183

on the amount of the debt plus all accruals authorized by law, from the date the debt is certified to the department until it is satisfied; and

A one (1) time twenty-five percent (25%) collection fee imposed on the amount of the debt plus all accruals authorized by law, as of the time of referral.

The department may retain the collection fee.

In the case of agencies and the Court of Justice, recovered funds and interest may, at the discretion of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, be returned to the agency certifying the debt or improper payment or to the Court of Justice for allocation as otherwise provided by law. If the recovered funds and interest are not returned to the agency or Court of Justice, the amounts shall be deposited in the budget reserve trust fund established in KRS

48.705

, except for Medicaid benefits and funds required by law to be remitted to a federal agency.

In the case of local governments, recovered funds and interest shall be returned to the referring local government for allocation as provided by ordinance, resolution, or as otherwise provided by law.

The commissioner of the department may refer to the Attorney General any unsatisfied claim, demand, account, or judgment in favor of the Commonwealth for further civil or criminal action under KRS

15.060

.

The department shall report annually by October 1 to the Legislative Research Commission on all referred certified debts, including at least a summary of the debts by agency, fund type, and age, the latter compiled in the following four (4) categories:

Debts from ninety (90) to one hundred seventy-nine (179) days old;

Debts from one hundred eighty (180) to three hundred sixty-four (364) days old;

Debts over one (1) year old but less than three (3) years old; and

Debts three (3) years old or older.

The annual report shall also include the collection amount of the debts in paragraph (a) of this subsection and the accounts to which the amounts are credited.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish standards that agencies shall use in determining when to write debts off the books.

This section shall not affect the collection of delinquent taxes by sheriffs or county attorneys under KRS

91A.070

or

134.504

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 192, § 2, effective April 21, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 62, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 88, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.

45.239.
Debts owed Court of Justice — Identification and collection of debts and liquidated debts — Annual report.

The Court of Justice shall initiate, by October 1, 2004, fully implement by October 1, 2005, and thereafter maintain a system for tracking and identifying debts.

The Court of Justice shall establish and operate a system for collecting debt.

In establishing the systems required by this section, the Court of Justice shall consider technology that could assist in the accurate, timely, and efficient delivery of payments of debts.

The Court of Justice, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the Department of Revenue shall collaborate to implement a system, if feasible, to identify and collect debts in existence prior to the implementation date of the system required by subsection (1) of this section. Confidential information shared among these entities to identify and collect debts shall not be divulged to any unauthorized person. Debts collected under this subsection shall be reported annually and designated separately as part of the report required pursuant to KRS

45.238

beginning on October 1, 2005, and ending with the report filed on or before October 1, 2009.

The Court of Justice, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and Department of Revenue shall collaborate to implement a system, if feasible, to identify and collect liquidated debts in existence prior to the implementation date of the system required by subsection (1) of this section. Confidential information shared among these entities to identify and collect debts shall not be divulged to any unauthorized person. Debts collected under this subsection shall be reported annually to the Legislative Research Commission beginning on October 1, 2005, and ending with the report filed on or before October 1, 2009.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 192, § 3, effective April 21, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 63, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 125, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/21/2004). This section was created by 2004 Ky. Acts chs. 118, sec. 7, and 192, sec. 3, which have been codified together. Subsection (1) of this statute was enacted identically in subsection (1) of ch. 118, sec. 7, and subsection (1) of ch. 192, sec. 3. Subsections (4) and (5) were enacted by the same two Acts with substantially similar, but nonidentical, text. Subsection (4) was created by ch. 192, sec. 3, subsec. (4), and subsection (5) was created by ch. 118, sec. 7, subsec. (2). Because the two subsections differ slightly in the texts, both have been codified in their entirety. Subsections (2) and (3) were enacted by subsections (2) and (3) of ch. 192, sec. 3.

45.240.
Treatment of erroneous payments recovered within 60 days of identification — KRS 45.237 and 45.238 applicable to erroneous payments recovered after 60 days.

Whenever any payment from public money is made in error, or for an amount in excess of the amount found to be properly due and payable, and the payment or excess amount is recovered within sixty (60) days from the date the erroneous or excess payment was identified, the funds shall be allocated to the fund from which the improper payment was expended, the balance in the appropriation from which the payment was made shall be increased by the amount recovered, and the amount recovered shall be deducted from the disbursements from that appropriation.

If the payment or excess amount which is later recovered is in the form of an unnegotiated State Treasurer’s check, said check shall be transmitted direct to the State Treasurer who shall void it. After voiding the check, the State Treasurer shall notify the appropriate agency of the action taken concerning the check.

Whenever any payment from public money is made in error, or for an amount in excess of the amount found to be properly due and payable, and the payment or excess amount is recovered after sixty (60) days from the date the erroneous or excess payment was identified, the provisions set forth in KRS

45.237

and

45.238

shall apply, and the funds shall be allocated as provided in those sections.

History.

1992b-39: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 179; 2004, ch. 192, § 5, effective April 21, 2004.

45.241.
Definitions — State agencies and Court of Justice to develop inventory of each debt — Liquidated debts of agency, Court of Justice, or local government submitted to Department of Revenue — Accounting of uncollected debt — Treatment of collected debt — Annual reports.

As used in this section:

“Debt” means:

For agencies, a sum certain which has been certified by an agency as due and owing; and

For local governments, a sum certain which has been certified by a local government as due and owing, including but not limited to any delinquent taxes or fees other than delinquent real and personal property taxes;

“Liquidated debt” means:

For agencies, a legal debt for a sum certain which has been certified by an agency as final due and owing, all appeals and legal actions having been exhausted;

For local governments, a legal debt for a sum certain which has been certified by a local government as final due and owing, all appeals and legal actions having been exhausted, including but not limited to any delinquent taxes or fees other than delinquent real and personal property taxes; and

For the Court of Justice, a legal debt including any fine, fee, court costs, or restitution due the Commonwealth, which have been imposed by a final sentence of a trial court of the Commonwealth and for which the time permitted for payment pursuant to the provisions of KRS

534.020

has expired;

“Agency” means an organizational unit or administrative body in the executive branch of state government, as defined in KRS

12.010

;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Court of Justice” means the Administrative Office of the Courts, all courts, and all clerks of the courts;

“Forgivable loan agreement” means a loan agreement entered into between an agency and a borrower that establishes specific conditions, which, if satisfied by the borrower, allows the agency to forgive a portion or all of the loan;

“Improper payment” means a payment made to a vendor, provider, or recipient due to error, fraud, or abuse; and

“Local government” means any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county, or unified local government of the Commonwealth.

Each agency and the Court of Justice shall develop, maintain, and update in a timely manner an ongoing inventory of each debt owed to it, including debts due to improper payments, and shall make every reasonable effort to collect each debt. Within sixty (60) days after the identification of a debt, each agency shall begin administrative action to collect the debt.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall review each agency’s debt identification and collection procedures as part of the annual audit of state agencies.

An agency shall not forgive any debt owed to it unless that agency has entered into a forgivable loan agreement with a borrower, or unless otherwise provided by statute.

For those agencies without statutory procedures for collecting debts, the Department of Revenue shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to prescribe standards and procedures with which those agencies shall comply regarding collection of debts, notices to persons owing debt, information to be monitored concerning the debts, and an appeals process.

Each agency and the Court of Justice shall identify all liquidated debts, including debts due to improper payments, and shall submit a list of those liquidated debts in the form and manner prescribed by the department to the department for review. The department shall review the information submitted by the agencies and the Court of Justice and shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt of the information, determine whether it would be cost-effective for the department to further pursue collection of the liquidated debts.

A local government, after making reasonable efforts to collect its debts, may by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law, submit a list of its liquidated debts that have been due and owing for more than ninety (90) days to the department for review to determine whether it would be cost-effective for the department to pursue collection of the liquidated debts. The department shall review the information submitted by a local government and shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt of the information, determine whether it would be cost-effective for the department to further pursue collection of the liquidated debts.

The department may, after consultation with the agency, Court of Justice, or a local government, return the liquidated debt to the entity submitting the liquidated debt if:

The request for review contains insufficient information; or

The debt is not feasible to collect.

Any return of a liquidated debt shall be in writing, and shall state why the debt is being returned.

The department shall identify in writing to the submitting agency, Court of Justice, or local government, the liquidated debts it has determined that it can pursue in a cost-effective manner, and the agency, Court of Justice, or local government shall officially refer the identified liquidated debts to the department for collection.

The agency, Court of Justice, and local government shall retain a complete record of all liquidated debts referred to the department for collection until the debt is collected, forgiven, or returned as uncollectible.

Each agency, the Court of Justice, and local government shall make appropriate accounting of any uncollected debt as prescribed by law.

If the agency recovers the debt funds prior to referral to the department, the agency shall retain the collected funds in accordance with its statutory authority.

Upon referral of a liquidated debt to the department, the liquidated debt shall accrue the following amounts:

Interest on the total amount of the debt plus legal accruals at the tax interest rate provided in KRS

131.183

, from the time of referral until paid; and

A one (1) time twenty-five percent (25%) collection fee on the total amount of the debt plus legal accruals, as of the time of referral; unless the interest and collection fee are waived by the department.

The interest and collection fee shall be in addition to any other costs accrued prior to the time of referral.

The department may deduct and retain from the liquidated debt recovered an amount equal to the lesser of the collection fee or the actual expenses incurred in the collection of the debt.

In the case of agencies and the Court of Justice, any funds recovered by the department after the deduction of the department’s cost of collection expenses may, at the discretion of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, be returned to the agency identifying the liquidated debt or to the Court of Justice for allocation as otherwise provided by law. If the recovered funds and interest are not returned to the agency or Court of Justice, the amounts shall be deposited in the general fund, except for Medicaid benefits funds and funds required by law to be remitted to a federal agency, which shall be remitted as required by law.

In the case of local governments, any funds recovered by the department after the deduction of the department’s cost of collection expenses shall be returned to the local government referring the liquidated debt, for allocation as provided by ordinance, resolution, or as otherwise provided by law.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from entering into a memorandum of agreement with an agency pursuant to KRS 131.130(11), for collection of debts prior to liquidation. If an agency enters into an agreement with the department, the agency shall retain funds collected according to the provisions of the agreement.

This section shall not affect any agreement between the department and an agency entered into under KRS 131.130(11) that is in effect on July 13, 2004, that provides for the collection of liquidated debts by the department on behalf of the agency.

This section shall not affect the collection of delinquent taxes by sheriffs or county attorneys under KRS

91A.070

or

134.504

.

This section shall not affect the collection of performance or reclamation bonds.

Upon receipt of a referred liquidated debt and after its determination that the debt is feasible and cost-effective to collect, the department shall pursue collection of the referred debt in accordance with KRS

131.030

.

By administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, the department shall prescribe the electronic format and form of, and the information required in, a referral.

The department shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on the collection of debts, including debts due to improper payments, referred by agencies and the Court of Justice. The report shall include the total amount by agency and fund type of liquidated debt that has been referred to the department; the amount of each referring agency’s liquidated debt, by fund type, that has been collected by the department; and the total amount of each referring agency’s liquidated debt, by fund type, that the department determined to be cost-ineffective to collect, including the reasons for the determinations.

Each cabinet shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on:

The amount of previous fiscal year unliquidated debt by agency, including debts due to improper payments, fund type, category, and age, the latter to be categorized as less than one (1) year, less than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over ten (10) years; and

The amount, by agency, of liquidated debt, including debts due to improper payments, not referred to the department; a summary, by criteria listed in subsection (6)(a) of this section, of reasons the department provided for not requesting referral of those liquidated debts; and a summary of the actions each agency is taking to collect those liquidated debts.

Beginning on October 1, 2005, the Court of Justice shall report annually by October 1 of each year to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue the amount of previous fiscal year unliquidated debt by county and whether in the Circuit Court or District Court; and fund type and age, the latter categorized as less than one (1) year, less than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over ten (10) years. The first year for which the Court of Justice shall be required to report is the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2004 and ending on June 30, 2005. The Court of Justice shall not be required to report unliquidated debts in existence prior to July 1, 2004.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on the amount of the General Government Cabinet’s unliquidated debt by agency, fund type, and age, the latter categorized as less than one (1) year, less than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over ten (10) years.

At the time of submission of a liquidated debt to the department for review, the referring agency, the Court of Justice, or, where feasible, the local government shall provide information about the debt to the State Treasurer for the Treasurer’s action under KRS 44.030(1).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 64, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 44, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 10, § 54, effective January 1, 2010; 2013, ch. 88, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 158, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 142, sec. 9, provides, “Notwithstanding any statutory law or administrative regulations, any debt approved and funded by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation or the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority may be renegotiated, amended, or forgiven with approval of their respective boards. Any debt collected on behalf of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority or Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall be returned to them subject to any reasonable fees due for services rendered by other agencies or private vendors in collecting the debt on their behalf and shall not be deemed general funds.”

45.242.
Unauthorized allotment obligations.

No head of a budget unit or assistant designated by him shall approve any advice of employment, purchase order, contract requisition for reservation of funds, or letter of travel authorization request for travel outside of Kentucky that will involve an expenditure of any sum in excess of the unencumbered balance of the allotment to which the resulting expenditure will be chargeable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 38, effective July 1, 1983; 1998, ch. 120, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

2016-2018 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 148, Pt. I, A, 4, (9) at 1034.

45.244.
Obligations not authorized by appropriation or budget allotment.

Except as expressly authorized in this chapter, no person shall incur, or order or vote to incur, any obligation against the Commonwealth in excess of, or any expenditure not authorized by, an appropriation of the General Assembly and an allotment of funds provided by KRS Chapter 48. Any such obligation so incurred shall not be binding against the Commonwealth, and shall be void and incapable of ratification by any administrative authority of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 39, effective July 1, 1983.

2016-2018 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 148, Pt. I, A, 4, (9) at 1034.

45.245.
Submission of six (6) year road plan and appropriations to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

45.2451.
Definition of “project” for KRS 45.245, 45.247, and 45.248. [Repealed.]

45.246.
Compliance with KRS 45.245 to 45.247. [Repealed.]

45.247.
Highway construction contingency account.

There is created within the road fund the highway construction contingency account. The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the account by the General Assembly. The Transportation Cabinet may transfer money from the highway construction contingency account to a highway construction project, for expenditure thereon. These moneys may be authorized by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet for:

Projects of an emergency nature;

Promotion of economic or industrial development;

Relief of a hazardous condition;

Other purposes that the secretary determines to be a priority;

Provision of required state match for any unanticipated federal funds made available by the Federal Highway Administration to the Commonwealth as a result of other states not utilizing their total federal obligation;

The funding of any nonfederal share of a project in a previous or the current biennial highway construction programs that exceeds its cost estimate;

The nonfederal share of federal emergency highway projects, federal discretionary projects, and federal demonstration projects; and

The nonfederal share of projects due to an increase in the federal apportionment or federal obligation limits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 502, § 4, effective April 11, 1990; 1992, ch. 433, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 299, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 532, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 4, (4) at 2018.

45.248.
Approval of proposed contingency account transfer by legislative committee — Monitoring of costs of state highway construction. [Repealed.]

45.250.
Forms for use in state financial and business administration. [Repealed.]

45.251.
Expenditures — Scope — Methodology — Recordkeeping.

Expenditures shall be limited to the amounts and purposes for which appropriations are made. All expenditures shall be reflected in the unified and integrated system of accounts as provided by KRS

45.305

.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prescribe all information technology standards, system attributes, and components to be used in, or in conjunction with, the unified accounting system. The components must be consistent with Commonwealth standards contained within the information technology architecture, as provided by the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

The Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall designate the officer or employee authorized to approve advices of employment, purchase orders and contracts, and requisitions for reservation of funds, and no advice, order, contract, or requisition shall be honored as a commitment statement unless the designation has been conveyed to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may approve for payment any expenditure presented by a budget unit, provided that the Finance and Administration Cabinet is able to determine that the expenditure is to satisfy a liability of the Commonwealth of Kentucky created on behalf of that budget unit in fulfilling the governmental function assigned to that budget unit and that the expenditure is being made from the unexpended balance of a proper allotment.

Subsidiary records shall be maintained to report the financial operation and condition of each budget unit. These subsidiary records shall be compatible with the unified accounting system prescribed by subsection (1) of this section and by KRS

45.305

, and may be on the accrual basis or cash basis. Expenditures may be by prior encumbrances or by straight disbursements. The subsidiary records may be maintained by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and by the budget unit involved. When a budget unit is authorized to maintain subsidiary records, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have authority to prescribe the accounting and preauditing procedures. The unified system of accounts shall conform to accepted management and accounting principles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, 34, effective July 1, 1983; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 17, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 506, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 65, effective June 20, 2005.

45.252.
Receivable accounts.

Budget units having bona fide receivables may, with the permission of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, establish receivable accounts with a corresponding credit to an allotment account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 37, effective July 1, 1983.

45.253.
Revolving, trust, or agency accounts — Charges for services by agencies.

Revolving accounts may be established by appropriation in a branch budget bill to finance activities which are self-supporting in whole or in part.

Trust and agency accounts may be established by a branch budget bill to receive and disburse contributions, gifts, donations, devises, and federal appropriations, and, when authorized by law, by depositing all of the fees (which include fees for maintenance in state institutions, incidental fees, tuition fees, fees for board and room, athletics, and student activities), rentals, admittance, sales, licenses collected by law, subventions, and other miscellaneous receipts of budget units.

The head of the budget unit or other responsible fiscal agent of the unit for which a revolving, trust, or agency account has been established shall deposit with the State Treasury all receipts of the character above described, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall credit all receipts to the budget unit and shall keep separate accounting for each account so established.

The amounts credited to any revolving, trust, or agency account so provided, shall be held available for disbursement for the purpose provided by law and shall not be diverted to any other purpose. Revolving, trust, or agency accounts shall be subject to withdrawal from the State Treasury by the head of each budget unit when actually needed, on requisition to the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the same manner provided by law as other state funds are withdrawn. Funds received from the federal government in the form of grants or otherwise may be expended for the purpose intended even though received in a fiscal year other than that in which the related original encumbrance or expenditure was incurred. Trust and agency funds shall be allotted before an expenditure is made; and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may withhold allotment of general fund appropriations to the extent trust and agency funds are available.

Subject to prior approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches, any budget unit which, as an incident to its authorized duties and functions, furnishes requested services or materials to any persons outside state government, where such services or materials are not required by law to be furnished gratuitously, may charge such persons an amount not to exceed the total expense to the budget unit of the services or materials furnished. The receipts from the approved charges shall be credited to the surplus account of the general fund. Payroll deductions for the Department of Kentucky State Police legal fund shall be made without any service fees or charges.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology may charge any agency of local government an amount, not to exceed the total expense to the department, for services rendered or materials furnished at the request of the local government agency, unless the services or materials are required by law to be furnished gratuitously. The receipts from the authorized charges shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the trust and agency fund, the Commonwealth Office of Technology’s operating account.

All receipts which accrue as the result of the Commonwealth Office of Technology’s providing on-line computer access to public records by nongovernment entities shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the trust and agency fund, the Commonwealth Office of Technology’s operating account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 35, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 55, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 507, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 506, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 66, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 126, effective June 26, 2007.

45.260.
Collection of fees and other amounts due the state through the budget units.

Fees for licenses, permits or certificates of any kind due any budget unit shall be collected by the budget unit at the time such licenses, permits or certificates are issued by it, and all other money accruing to the budget units or to the state through the budget units shall also, as far as practicable, be collected at the time the services are rendered or at the time of accrual by the budget units rendering the services or assessing the charges or otherwise giving rise to the claims in favor of the state. When collections cannot be so made, the budget units concerned shall render bills to the persons liable for the amounts due or accruing, and shall collect such bills. Each bill shall carry notice to the effect that checks and money orders shall be made payable to the State Treasurer.

History.

1992b-41: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 260, § 6.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fees of certain officers, how reported to state, KRS Ch. 64.

Report and accounting of state funds by local officers, KRS Ch. 46.

45.270.
Control of receivables. [Repealed.]

45.280.
Petty cash funds. [Repealed.]

45.285.
Audit of state agency by auditor of public accounts — Contract for audit by certified public accountant — Right of review. [Repealed.]

45.290.
Finance and Administration Cabinet to reconcile statements of depositories and State Treasurer’s accounts.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, during the first ten (10) days of each month, reconcile the statements furnished by the state depositories and the accounts of the State Treasurer.

History.

1992b-53: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Checking and verification of state warrants, KRS

41.170

.

45.300.
System of state accounts. [Repealed.]